District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.09

Motor Vehicle Owners’ and Operators’ Financial Responsibility Fund, D. C.

Repealed.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 123, ch. 222, § 9
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-409.
1973 Ed., § 40-425.